Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-65] Continuances. A
court-martial may, for reasonable cause, grant a continuance to any party for
such time, and as often, as may appear to be just. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next